Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. Boards and Commissions.

Sec. 29.20.300.
School boards.

Each municipal school district has a school board. Except as provided in (b) of this section, members of a school board are elected at the regular election for three-year terms and until their successors take office. Members are elected at large unless a different method of election has been approved by the voters in a regular election.

The assembly is the school board for a third class borough. The mayor is the presiding officer of the assembly and president of the school board. However, the mayor may not veto an action of the school board.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For further provisions relating to school boards, see AS 14.14.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d, Schools, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 29.20.310.
Utility boards.

The governing body of a municipality operating a public utility may provide by ordinance for a utility board of five members and define the board’s powers and duties.

As determined by ordinance, members of a utility board are either appointed by the mayor and confirmed by the governing body or are elected at a regular election. The term of a utility board member is two years and until a successor is selected and qualifies. However, the governing body may by ordinance provide for a different term not to exceed four years. The current term of an elected incumbent may not be altered.

Vacancies on a utility board are filled by the mayor. Executive appointments shall be confirmed by the governing body. A person appointed to fill a vacancy on a utility board serves until the expiration of the term for which appointed and until a successor is elected and qualifies.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, a utility board shall

choose its chairman and secretary;

appoint the manager of the public utility for a term not longer than five years and set the manager’s salary;

formulate and enforce the general rules and policies of the utility.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 516 et seq.

Municipality’s power to sell, lease, or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein. 60 ALR2d 595.

Sec. 29.20.320.
Other boards and commissions.

The governing body may by ordinance establish advisory, administrative, technical, or quasi-judicial boards and commissions.

Members of boards and commissions, except for members of the board of adjustment and assembly members serving on the board of equalization, are appointed by the mayor and confirmed by the governing body.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

While local emergency planning districts may have the same geographical boundaries as service areas, the districts and the LEPCs cannot take the form of service areas. May 29, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.